src/gobelo_grammar_toolkit/hfst/chitonga_hfst/chitonga.lexc
! ==============================================================
! Chitonga — Morphotactics Lexicon   chitonga.lexc
! Helsinki FST (HFST) format
! ==============================================================
! Source: chitonga_grammar.yaml  verb_system + concord_system
! Slot template: NEG(S1) PRE(S2) SM(S3) NEG(S4) TAM(S5)
!                MODAL(S6) OM(S7) ROOT(S8) EXT(S9) FV(S10) POST(S11)
!
! Compile:
!   hfst-lexc chitonga.lexc -o chitonga-morphotactics.hfst
! ==============================================================

! ── MULTICHARACTER SYMBOLS ────────────────────────────────────
! All abstract morpheme tags and flag diacritics must be declared
! here before any lexicon entries reference them.

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech
+N  +V  +ADJ  +ADV  +CONJ  +PREP  +PRON  +DEM  +INTERJ  +LOC  +AUX

! Noun classes (Meinhof numbering, all 18 + subclasses)
+NC1  +NC1a  +NC2  +NC2a  +NC2b
+NC3  +NC4   +NC5  +NC6
+NC7  +NC8
+NC9  +NC10
+NC11
+NC12 +NC13
+NC14
+NC15
+NC16 +NC17 +NC18

! Number
+SG  +PL

! Tense / Aspect / Mood  (from grammar tam: section)
! NOTE: +PST and +REM_PST share surface form "aka" — tone distinguishes.
!       The tag is the disambiguator in the lexical representation.
+PRES       ! present habitual  (form: a,  tone: L)
+PST        ! general past      (form: aka, tone: L-L)
+REC_PST    ! recent past       (form: ali, tone: L-L)
+REM_PST    ! remote past       (form: aka, tone: H-L) — same form as PST
+FUT_NEAR   ! near future       (form: yo)
+FUT_REM    ! remote future     (form: za)
+HAB        ! habitual          (form: la)
+PERF       ! perfect           (form: a, distinguished by FV -ide)
+SUBJ       ! subjunctive       (zero TAM + FV -e)
+IMP_SG     ! imperative SG     (form: Ø)
+IMP_PL     ! imperative PL     (form: Ø, FV: -eni)
+COND       ! conditional       (form: nga)
+POT        ! potential         (form: nga)
+PROG       ! progressive       (form: -la-/-ci-)

! Polarity
+NEG  +AFF

! Verb extensions (zones Z1-Z4, grammar derivational_extensions)
! Z1 — valency increasing
+APPL       ! applicative       -il-/-el-
+CAUS       ! causative         -is-/-isy-/-y-
+TRANS      ! transitiviser     -ol-/-ok-
+CONT       ! contactive        -at-
! Z2 — valency adjusting
+RECIP      ! reciprocal        -an-
+STAT       ! stative/neuter    -ik-/-ek-
! Z3 — voice
+PASS       ! passive           -w-/-iw-/-ew-
! Z4 — aspectual/lexical
+INTENS     ! intensive         -isy-/-esy-
+REDUP      ! reduplicative     -isisy-/-esesy-
+PERF_EXT   ! perfective ext    -ilil-/-elel-
+REV        ! reversive         -ul-/-ol-
+REPET      ! repetitive        -ulul-/-olol-
+FREQ       ! frequentative     -aul-/-auk-
+POS        ! positional        -am-

! Subject markers (SM) — all 18 NCs + personal pronouns
! Grammar source: concord_system.concords.subject_concords
+SM1SG      ! ndi-    1st person singular
+SM2SG      ! u-/w-   2nd person singular
+SM1PL      ! tu-/tw- 1st person plural exclusive
+SM1PL_IN   ! tw-     1st person plural inclusive
+SM2PL      ! mu-/mw- 2nd person plural
+SM1        ! u-/w-   NC1 3SG human
+SM1a       ! u-/w-   NC1a kinship/proper
+SM2        ! ba-/b-  NC2 3PL human
+SM2a       ! ba-/b-  NC2a
+SM2b       ! ba-/b-  NC2b honorific
+SM3        ! u-/w-   NC3
+SM4        ! i-/y-   NC4
+SM5        ! li-/ly- NC5
+SM6        ! a-/Ø-   NC6
+SM7        ! ci-/c-  NC7
+SM8        ! zi-/zyi-/z- NC8
+SM9        ! i-/y-   NC9
+SM10       ! zi-/zy- NC10
+SM11       ! lu-/lw- NC11
+SM12       ! ka-/k-  NC12
+SM13       ! tu-/tw- NC13
+SM14       ! bu-/bw- NC14
+SM15       ! ku-/kw- NC15
+SM16       ! a-/aa-  NC16 locative
+SM17       ! ku-/kw- NC17 locative
+SM18       ! mu-/mw- NC18 locative

! Object markers (OM) — same set
+OM1SG  +OM2SG  +OM1PL  +OM2PL
+OM1  +OM2  +OM3  +OM4  +OM5  +OM6
+OM7  +OM8  +OM9  +OM10  +OM11  +OM12
+OM13  +OM14  +OM15  +OM16  +OM17  +OM18

! Final vowel tags (grammar final_vowels section)
+FV_IND     ! -a    indicative / active
+FV_SUBJ    ! -e    subjunctive
+FV_NEG     ! -i    negative
+FV_PERF    ! -ide  perfective (perfect aspect)
+FV_IMP_SG  ! -a    imperative singular (same surface as IND)
+FV_IMP_PL  ! -eni  imperative plural
+FV_INF     ! -a    infinitive (NC15)

! Post-final clitics (grammar post_final section)
+REL        ! -yo/-o  relativiser
+Q          ! na/-nzi  question marker
+EMP        ! -ko      emphatic
+NEG_POST   ! -pe      negation reinforcement
+LOC_CLITIC ! -mo      locative clitic

! ── FLAG DIACRITICS ───────────────────────────────────────────
! Purpose: enforce agreement between noun class features
! spread across multiple verb slots (SM → OM → demonstrative).
! Grammar ref: slot_co_occurrence validation rules.
!
! Convention:  @P.FEAT.VAL@  =  Positive (set)
!              @R.FEAT.VAL@  =  Require (must match)
!              @D.FEAT.VAL@  =  Disallow (must NOT match)
!
! NC agreement flags — set by SM lexicon, required by OM lexicon
@P.NC.1@   @R.NC.1@   @D.NC.1@
@P.NC.2@   @R.NC.2@   @D.NC.2@
@P.NC.3@   @R.NC.3@   @D.NC.3@
@P.NC.4@   @R.NC.4@   @D.NC.4@
@P.NC.5@   @R.NC.5@   @D.NC.5@
@P.NC.6@   @R.NC.6@   @D.NC.6@
@P.NC.7@   @R.NC.7@   @D.NC.7@
@P.NC.8@   @R.NC.8@   @D.NC.8@
@P.NC.9@   @R.NC.9@   @D.NC.9@
@P.NC.10@  @R.NC.10@  @D.NC.10@
@P.NC.11@  @R.NC.11@  @D.NC.11@
@P.NC.12@  @R.NC.12@  @D.NC.12@
@P.NC.13@  @R.NC.13@  @D.NC.13@
@P.NC.14@  @R.NC.14@  @D.NC.14@
@P.NC.15@  @R.NC.15@  @D.NC.15@
@P.NC.16@  @R.NC.16@  @D.NC.16@
@P.NC.17@  @R.NC.17@  @D.NC.17@
@P.NC.18@  @R.NC.18@  @D.NC.18@

! Negation constraint flags
! Grammar rule: FV_NEG (-i) requires SLOT1 negation_pre (ta-)
! Grammar rule: SLOT1 negation_pre and SLOT4 negation_infix are mutually exclusive
@P.NEG.ON@   @R.NEG.ON@   @D.NEG.ON@

! Mood-FV agreement flags
! Grammar rule: modal.SUBJ/POT (nga-) requires FV_SUBJ (-e)
@P.MOOD.SUBJ@  @R.MOOD.SUBJ@
@P.MOOD.POT@   @R.MOOD.POT@

! Reciprocal plural constraint
! Grammar rule: RECIP requires plural subject (SM1PL, SM2PL, or NC2+)
@P.NUM.PL@  @R.NUM.PL@

! Morpheme boundary gate (for CA.1 l→d rule scoping)
@P.MORPHBOUND.ON@


! ==============================================================
! ROOT LEXICON — entry point for the transducer
! ==============================================================

LEXICON Root
  NounPrefix ;       ! nominal paths (all NC classes)
  VerbPath ;         ! verbal paths (negation → SM → TAM → OM → root → ext → FV)
  ClosedClass ;      ! non-inflecting: conj, prep, interj, adv


! ==============================================================
! VERBAL PATH
! SLOT1 → SLOT2 → SLOT3 → SLOT4 → SLOT5 → SLOT6 →
! SLOT7 → SLOT8 → SLOT9 → SLOT10 → SLOT11
! ==============================================================

! ── SLOT 1: Pre-initial negation ─────────────────────────────
! Grammar: negation_pre.present forms: ["ta"]
!          negation_pre.past forms: ["tee","tii"]
!          negation_pre.subjunctive forms: ["tii"]
! Sets @P.NEG.ON@ so FinalVowel knows to produce -i not -a.

LEXICON VerbPath
  PreInitialNeg ;       ! SLOT1 — with negation
  PreInitial ;          ! SLOT2 — no negation (goes direct to pre-initial)

LEXICON PreInitialNeg
  ta+NEG%@P.NEG.ON@:ta PreInitial ;     ! present negative
  tee+NEG%@P.NEG.ON@:tee PreInitial ;   ! past emphatic negative
  tii+NEG%@P.NEG.ON@:tii PreInitial ;   ! subjunctive prohibition

! ── SLOT 2: Pre-initial elements ─────────────────────────────
! Grammar: pre_initial COND=ka, TEMP1=ni/no, TEMP2=lyo

LEXICON PreInitial
  ka+COND:ka SubjectMarker ;   ! remote future / conditional
  ni+TEMP:ni SubjectMarker ;   ! when/if conditional
  no+TEMP:no SubjectMarker ;
  lyo+TEMP:lyo SubjectMarker ; ! when (future temporal)
  SubjectMarker ;              ! zero pre-initial (most common)

! ── SLOT 3: Subject markers ───────────────────────────────────
! Grammar: concord_system.concords.subject_concords
! Forms extracted directly from grammar YAML.
! @P.NC.X@ sets the NC feature for OM agreement downstream.

LEXICON SubjectMarker
! Personal pronouns
  ndi%+SM1SG:ndi TenseMarker ;                        ! 1SG
  u%+SM2SG:u TenseMarker ;                            ! 2SG
  w%+SM2SG:w TenseMarker ;                            ! 2SG before V
  tu%+SM1PL%@P.NUM.PL@:tu TenseMarker ;               ! 1PL excl
  tw%+SM1PL_IN%@P.NUM.PL@:tw TenseMarker ;            ! 1PL incl before V
  mu%+SM2PL%@P.NUM.PL@:mu TenseMarker ;               ! 2PL
  mw%+SM2PL%@P.NUM.PL@:mw TenseMarker ;               ! 2PL before V
! NC1 — u-/w- (3SG human)
  u%+SM1%@P.NC.1@:u TenseMarker ;
  w%+SM1%@P.NC.1@:w TenseMarker ;
! NC2 — ba-/b- (3PL human)
  ba%+SM2%@P.NC.2@%@P.NUM.PL@:ba TenseMarker ;
  b%+SM2%@P.NC.2@%@P.NUM.PL@:b TenseMarker ;
! NC3 — u-/w-
  u%+SM3%@P.NC.3@:u TenseMarker ;
  w%+SM3%@P.NC.3@:w TenseMarker ;
! NC4 — i-/y-
  i%+SM4%@P.NC.4@:i TenseMarker ;
  y%+SM4%@P.NC.4@:y TenseMarker ;
! NC5 — li-/ly-
  li%+SM5%@P.NC.5@:li TenseMarker ;
  ly%+SM5%@P.NC.5@:ly TenseMarker ;
! NC6 — a-/Ø-
  a%+SM6%@P.NC.6@:a TenseMarker ;
! NC7 — ci-/c-
  ci%+SM7%@P.NC.7@:ci TenseMarker ;
  c%+SM7%@P.NC.7@:c TenseMarker ;
! NC8 — zi-/zyi-/z-
  zi%+SM8%@P.NC.8@:zi TenseMarker ;
  zyi%+SM8%@P.NC.8@:zyi TenseMarker ;
  z%+SM8%@P.NC.8@:z TenseMarker ;
! NC9 — i-/y-
  i%+SM9%@P.NC.9@:i TenseMarker ;
  y%+SM9%@P.NC.9@:y TenseMarker ;
! NC10 — zi-/zy-
  zi%+SM10%@P.NC.10@%@P.NUM.PL@:zi TenseMarker ;
  zy%+SM10%@P.NC.10@%@P.NUM.PL@:zy TenseMarker ;
! NC11 — lu-/lw-
  lu%+SM11%@P.NC.11@:lu TenseMarker ;
  lw%+SM11%@P.NC.11@:lw TenseMarker ;
! NC12 — ka-/k-
  ka%+SM12%@P.NC.12@:ka TenseMarker ;
  k%+SM12%@P.NC.12@:k TenseMarker ;
! NC13 — tu-/tw-
  tu%+SM13%@P.NC.13@%@P.NUM.PL@:tu TenseMarker ;
  tw%+SM13%@P.NC.13@%@P.NUM.PL@:tw TenseMarker ;
! NC14 — bu-/bw-
  bu%+SM14%@P.NC.14@:bu TenseMarker ;
  bw%+SM14%@P.NC.14@:bw TenseMarker ;
! NC15 — ku-/kw-
  ku%+SM15%@P.NC.15@:ku TenseMarker ;
  kw%+SM15%@P.NC.15@:kw TenseMarker ;
! NC16 — a-/aa- (locative)
  a%+SM16%@P.NC.16@:a TenseMarker ;
  aa%+SM16%@P.NC.16@:aa TenseMarker ;
! NC17 — ku-/kw- (locative)
  ku%+SM17%@P.NC.17@:ku TenseMarker ;
  kw%+SM17%@P.NC.17@:kw TenseMarker ;
! NC18 — mu-/mw- (locative)
  mu%+SM18%@P.NC.18@:mu TenseMarker ;
  mw%+SM18%@P.NC.18@:mw TenseMarker ;


! ── SLOT 4: Negation infix (after SM, before TAM) ─────────────
! Grammar: negation_infix forms: ["-ta-"]
! Only appears in subordinate clause negatives.
! Co-occurrence constraint: SLOT1 negation_pre @D.NEG.ON@ blocks this.

LEXICON TenseMarker
  %@D.NEG.ON@ta%+NEG%@P.NEG.ON@:ta TenseMarkerCore ; ! infix neg (subordinate)
  TenseMarkerCore ;              ! no infix neg (main clause)

! ── SLOT 5: TAM markers ───────────────────────────────────────
! Grammar source: verbal_system_components.tam
! NOTE: PST and REM_PST share surface "aka" — tag distinguishes them.

LEXICON TenseMarkerCore
  a%+PRES:a ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;              ! present habitual (tone L)
  aka%+PST:aka ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;           ! general past (tone L-L)
  ali%+REC_PST:ali ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;       ! recent past
  aka%+REM_PST:aka ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;       ! remote past (tone H-L — same surface as PST)
  yo%+FUT_NEAR:yo ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;        ! near future
  za%+FUT_REM:za ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;         ! remote future
  la%+HAB:la ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;             ! habitual
  a%+PERF:a ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;              ! perfect (FV -ide disambiguates from PRES)
  ObjectMarkerOrRoot ;                        ! zero TAM (subjunctive/consecutive)

! ── SLOT 6: Modal / Auxiliary ─────────────────────────────────
! Grammar: modal.COND forms: ["nga"], modal.POT forms: ["nga"]
! These share surface form; tag distinguishes.
! Sets @P.MOOD.SUBJ@ to enforce FV_SUBJ (-e).
